Missouri, session 2026, SB1024.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 195.080, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 195.080,
to read as follows:
195.080. 1. Except as otherwise provided in this
chapter and chapter 579, this chapter and chapter 579 shall
not apply to the following cases: prescribing,
administering, dispensing or selling at retail of liniments,
ointments, and other preparations that are susceptible of
external use only and that contain controlled substances in
such combinations of drugs as to prevent the drugs from
being readily extracted from such liniments, ointments, or
preparations, except that this chapter and chapter 579 shall
apply to all liniments, ointments, and other preparations
that contain coca leaves in any quantity or combination.
2. Unless otherwise provided in sections 334.037,
334.104, and 334.747, a practitioner, other than a
veterinarian, shall not issue an initial prescription for
more than a seven-day supply of any opioid controlled
substance upon the initial consultation and treatment of a
patient for acute pain. Upon any subsequent consultation
for the same pain, the practitioner may issue any
appropriate renewal, refill, or new prescription in

SB 1024 2
compliance with the general provisions of this chapter and
chapter 579. Prior to issuing an initial prescription for
an opioid controlled substance, a practitioner shall consult
with the patient regarding the quantity of the opioid and
the patient's option to fill the prescription in a lesser
quantity and shall inform the patient of the risks
associated with the opioid prescribed. If, in the
professional medical judgment of the practitioner, more than
a seven-day supply is required to treat the patient's acute
pain, the practitioner may issue a prescription for the
quantity needed to treat the patient; provided, that the
practitioner shall document in the patient's medical record
the condition triggering the necessity for more than a seven-
day supply and that a nonopioid alternative was not
appropriate to address the patient's condition. The
provisions of this subsection shall not apply to
prescriptions for opioid controlled substances for a patient
who is currently undergoing treatment for cancer or sickle
cell disease, is receiving hospice care from a hospice
certified under chapter 197 or palliative care, is a
resident of a long-term care facility licensed under chapter
198, or is receiving treatment for substance abuse or opioid
dependence.
3. A pharmacist or pharmacy shall not be subject to
disciplinary action or other civil or criminal liability for
dispensing or refusing to dispense medication in good faith
pursuant to an otherwise valid prescription that exceeds the
prescribing limits established by subsection 2 of this
section.
4. Unless otherwise provided in this section, the
quantity of Schedule II controlled substances prescribed or
dispensed at any one time shall be limited to a thirty-day

SB 1024 3
supply. The quantity of Schedule III, IV or V controlled
substances prescribed or dispensed at any one time shall be
limited to a ninety-day supply and shall be prescribed and
dispensed in compliance with the general provisions of this
chapter and chapter 579. The supply limitations provided in
this subsection may be increased up to three months if the
physician describes on the prescription form or indicates
via telephone, fax, or electronic communication to the
pharmacy to be entered on or attached to the prescription
form the medical reason for requiring the larger supply.
The supply limitations provided in this subsection shall not
apply if:
(1) The prescription is issued by a practitioner
located in another state according to and in compliance with
the applicable laws of that state and the United States and
dispensed to a patient located in another state; or
(2) The prescription is dispensed directly to a member
of the United States Armed Forces serving outside the United
States.
5. The partial filling of a prescription for a
Schedule II substance is permissible as defined by
regulation by the department of health and senior services.
6. (1) Prior to issuing an initial prescription for a
Schedule II controlled substance or any other opioid pain
reliever in a course of treatment for acute or chronic pain
and prior to issuing a third prescription of the same in the
same course of treatment, a practitioner shall discuss with
the patient, or the patient's parent or guardian if the
patient is under eighteen years of age and is not
emancipated, the risks associated with the drugs being
prescribed, including, but not limited to, the following:

SB 1024 4
(a) The risks of addiction and overdose associated
with opioid drugs and the dangers of taking opioid drugs
with alcohol, benzodiazepines, and other central nervous
system depressants;
(b) The reasons why the prescription is necessary;
(c) Alternative treatments that may be available; and
(d) The risks associated with the use of the drugs
prescribed, specifically that opioids are highly addictive,
even when taken as prescribed; that there is a risk of
developing a physical or psychological dependence on the
controlled substance; and that the risks of taking more
opioids than prescribed, or mixing sedatives,
benzodiazepines, or alcohol with opioids, may result in
fatal respiratory depression.
(2) The practitioner shall include a note in the
patient's medical record that the patient or the patient's
parent or guardian has discussed with the practitioner the
100 risks of developing a physical or psychological dependence
101 on the controlled substance and alternative treatments that
102 may be available. The consultation described in this
103 subsection shall satisfy the consultation requirements of
104 subsection 2 of this section for initial prescriptions for
105 more than a seven-day supply of any opioid controlled
106 substance.
107 (3) The provisions of this subsection shall not apply
108 to a prescription for a patient who is in active treatment
109 for cancer, receiving hospice care from a hospice certified
110 under chapter 197 or palliative care, is a resident of a
111 long-term care facility licensed under chapter 198, or is
112 receiving treatment for substance abuse or opioid dependence.
✓